Tennessee, session 114, SB0083.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 4-29-246(a), is amended by deleting
subdivision (37).
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 4-29-250(a), is amended by inserting
the following as a new subdivision:
( ) Statewide planning and policy council for the department of mental health and
substance abuse services, created by § 33-1-401;
SECTION 3. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB0083
000342
- 1 -